Missouri, session 2026, HB3160.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 526.010 as enacted by senate bill no. 22, one hundred third general
assembly, first regular session, and section 526.010 as enacted by senate bill no. 1211, ninety-
second general assembly, second regular session, are repealed and one new section enacted in
lieu thereof, to be known as section 526.010, to read as follows:
[526.010. 1. Injunctions may be granted by a circuit judge or an
associate circuit judge.
2. In any action in which the state or a statewide official is
preliminarily enjoined from implementing, enforcing, or otherwise
effectuating any provision of the Constitution of Missouri, any Missouri
statute, or any Missouri regulation, the attorney general may appeal the
preliminary injunction.
3. The attorney general may appeal any preliminary injunction that
existed prior to August 28, 2025, under subsection 2 of this section.]
526.010. 1. Injunctions may be granted by a circuit judge[,] or an associate circuit
judge.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3160 2
2. In any action in which a circuit judge or an associate circuit judge
preliminarily enjoins any party to that action, the party enjoined by the preliminary
injunction may appeal the grant of the preliminary injunction.
✔